Washington statutes.
RCW 1.12.028

Construction of statutes—Internal references as including amendments thereto.

If a statute refers to another statute of this state, the reference includes any amendments to the referenced statute unless a contrary intent is clearly expressed.

[ 1982 c 16 s 1.]